District of Columbia statutes.
36-502

Authority to establish, operate, and maintain a foreign trade zone.

(a)

Any private corporation or public corporation may make application for the privilege of establishing, operating, and maintaining a foreign trade zone or subzone in the District of Columbia, pursuant to 19 U.S.C. §§ 81a-81u. Following approval of the application by the Foreign Trade Zones Board established pursuant to 19 U.S.C. §§ 81a-81u, the private corporation or public corporation shall take all actions necessary to comply with 19 U.S.C. §§ 81a-81u and any other applicable laws, rules, and regulations adopted in accordance with 19 U.S.C. §§ 81a-81u.

(b)

Any activity in the District of Columbia authorized by 19 U.S.C. §§ 81a-81u to be conducted within a foreign trade zone or subzone:

(1)

May be conducted within a foreign trade zone or subzone operated by a private corporation or public corporation within the District of Columbia; and

(2)

Shall comply with the Zoning Regulations of the District of Columbia set forth in title 11 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (11 DCMR).

History

July 14, 1995, D.C. Law 11-28, § 3, 42 DCR 2569

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-808.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-502.
1981 Ed., § 29-722.